src/vro-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +ProN +Num

! Verbal MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf +PrfIpf +HstPrf +PluPrf +HstPluPrf
+Ind +Imprt +Cond +Jus +Quot +Sup +Ger 
! Subject indices
+Sx1Sg +Sx2Sg +Sx3Sg 
+Sx1Du +Sx2Du +Sx3Du 
+Sx1Pl +Sx2Pl +Sx3Pl 
! Object indices
+Oc1Sg +Oc2Sg +Oc3Sg 
+Oc1Du +Oc2Du +Oc3Du 
+Oc1Pl +Oc2Pl +Oc3Pl
 
+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +1Pl +2Pl +3Pl
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
+Inf
+Pos +Neg

! Nominal MSP
! Number
+Sg +Pl
! Case
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Abl +Dat +Loc +Pros +Tra +Abe +Adc +Ins +Apr +Ine +Ill +Ela +Egr
+Prl

+All
+Ord
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
+Qst

+Appr
+Advc
+Ter
+Pro
+Car 

+Pers
+Dem

+PstI
+PstII

+Clt
%>
! Protoletters for xfst
QAQ1 QAO1 EH1 QEQ1 INE1 ZD1 ZS1 V1
AO1 EI1 ZS1 ZD1 
INF1 ! used with infinitive -aq and gerund -õn
D1 ! partitive singular
Z1 ! "." to mark accent
E1 ! for vowel harmony with -lõ and -le 
SGGEN1 PLGEN1 PLPART1 ! These are for developing underlying morphology rules
PRSSG1 PRSSG2 PRSSG3
PRSPL1 PRSPL2 PRSPL3

! Key lexicon

LEXICON Root
AdjRoot ;
AdvRoot ;
NounRoot ; !../../tmp/
 NumRoot ;
 VerbRoot ;
CONJUNCTION ;
SUBJUNCTION ;
INTERJECTION ;
 NUMERAL ;
PronRoot ;
 POSTPOSITION ;
PUNCTUATION ;



! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CONJUNCTION 
но CT ;
нош CT ;

LEXICON CT
+CS: # ;
 
LEXICON SUBJUNCTION  
# ;

LEXICON INTERJECTION 
# ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
#;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
+Num: K;
+Num:%> CASESUF ;
+Num:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
+Ord:этӥ K;



LEXICON K
+Clt:%>ki # "also" ;
+Qst:а # ;
# ; 


LEXICON PUNCTUATION
#; 
LEXICON POSTPOSITION
#; 

LEXICON CADJ
+A: #; 
LEXICON DADJ
+A: #; 
LEXICON VADJ
+A: #;
 
LEXICON AdvEnd
#; 
LEXICON CASESUF
#; 
LEXICON PRON
#; 
LEXICON DEM
#; 
LEXICON PERS
#; 
